bn_BD/bn_IN.aff
# Complete Verb Conjugations
# =======================================================
SFX	v	Y	536
SFX	v	0	র/i		.		"নামানোর"				genetive$
SFX	v	0	টা/i		.		"যাওয়াটা"				classifier$
SFX	v	0	টায়		.		"যাওয়াটা"				classifier$
SFX	v	0	কে/i		.		"যাওয়াকে"				objective
SFX	v	0	তে/i		.		"যাওয়াতে"				locative$
SFX	v	0	তো/i		.		"যাওয়াতো"				emphatic to$
SFX	v	া	ি/wXi	[^য়]া	"জানি/চিরি"	আমি	চলিত/সাধু	present simple/present imperative$
SFX	v	য়া	ই/xXi	[^ও]য়া	"চুই"		আমি	চলিত/সাধু	present simple/present imperative$
SFX	v	ওয়া	ই/xXi	ওয়া		"খাই"		আমি	চলিত/সাধু	present simple/present imperative
SFX	v	নো	ইi		নো		"বোঝাই"	আমি	চলিত		present simple/present imperative
SFX	v	নো	ই/xXi	নো		"বুঝাই"	আমি	        সাধু	present simple/present imperative
SFX	v	0	0/βXi	ওয়া		"রহি"	আমি	        সাধু	present simple/present imperative$
SFX	v	া	িস/xXi	[^য়]া	"জানিস"	তুই	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple
SFX	v	য়া	স/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুস"		তুই	চলিত/সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	স/WX	ওয়া		"খাস"	তুই	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	স		নো		"বোঝাস"	তুই	চলিত  	present simple$
SFX	v	য়া	ইস/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইস"	তুই	         সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	স/xX	নো		"বুঝাস"	তুই	         সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	া	.		[^য়]া	"জান"	তুমি 	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple
SFX	v	য়া	ও		[^ও]য়া	"চোও"	তুমি	চলিত/সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	ও/θX		ওয়া		"খাও"	তুমি 	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple/present imperative
SFX	v	নো	ও		নো		"বোঝাও"	তুমি	চলিত	 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	ও/xX		নো		"বুঝাও"	তুমি	        সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	ওয়া	হ		[^া]ওয়া	"রহ"		তুমি	        সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	া	েন/Ni	[^য়]া	"জানেন"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple
SFX	v	য়া	ন/i		[^ও]য়া	"চোন"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	ন/i		ওয়া		"খান"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple
SFX	v	নো	ন/i		নো		"বোঝান"	তিনি	চলিত	 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	ন/xXi	নো		"বুঝান"	তিনি	        সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	ওয়া	হেন		[^া]ওয়া	"রহেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	হেনও		[^া]ওয়া	"রহেনও"	তিনি	        সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	া	ে 		[^য়]া	"জানে"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple
SFX	v	া	েও		[^য়]া	"জানেও"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple
SFX	v	য়া	য়		[^ও]য়া	"চোয়"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	য়া	য়ও		[^ও]য়া	"চোয়ও"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	য়		ওয়া		"খায়"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	ওয়া	য়ও		ওয়া		"খায়ও"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	য়		নো		"বোঝায়"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	য়ও		নো		"বোঝায়"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	য়/xX		নো		"বুঝায়"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	নো	য়ও/xX	নো		"বুঝায়ও"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	ওয়া	হে/i		[^া]ওয়া	"রহে"	সে	        সাধু	present simple
SFX	v	া	0/N		[^য়]া	"জান"	তুই	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative
SFX	v	য়া	0 		[^ও]য়া	"চো"		তুই	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative$
SFX	v	ওয়া	0		ওয়া		"খা"		তুই	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative					$
SFX	v	নো	0		নো		"বোঝা"	তুই	চলিত	 	present imperative					$
SFX	v	নো	0/xX	নো		"বুঝা"	তুই	        সাধু 	present imperative					$
SFX	v	া	্‌/N		া		"জান্‌"	তুই	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative alt ??? (banglatangla.com)
SFX	v	া	্		া		"কর‌্"	তুই	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative alt ??? (banglatangla.com)
SFX	v	া	ো 		[^য়]া	"জানো"	তুমি	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative$
SFX	v	য়া	ও 		[^ওয়া]য়া	"চোও"	তুমি	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative$
SFX	v	ওয়া	ও		ওয়া		"খাও"	তুমি 	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative (a repeat)
SFX	v	নো	ও		নো		"ঘুমাও"	তুমি 	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative (a repeat)
SFX	v	া	ুক/wX	[^য়]া	"জানুক"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	য়া	ক/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুক"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	াওয়া	াক		াওয়া 	"খাক"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	নো	ক/ZX	নো		"বোঝাক"	সে	চলিত	 	present imperative
SFX	v	নো	ক/xX	নো		"বুঝাক"	সে	        সাধু 	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	হি		[^া]ওয়া	"রহি"	আমি	        সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	হ্		[^া]ওয়া	"রহ্"		তুই	        সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	হো		[^া]ওয়া	"রহো"	তুমি	        সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	োক		[^া]ওয়া	"রোক" 	সে	চলিত	 	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	হুক		[^া]ওয়া	"রহুক" 	সে	        সাধু	present imperative$
SFX	v	ওয়া	হুন		[^া]ওয়া	"রহুন"	তিনি	        সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	য়া	উন/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুউন"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	য়া	উক/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুউক"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	উক/ζX	[^া]ওয়া 	"খউক"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	উন/ζX	[^া]ওয়া 	"খউন"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	উক/ηX	[^া]ওয়া 	"খউক"	সে	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	উন/ηX	[^া]ওয়া 	"খউন"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু	present imperative
SFX	v	া	ুন/wX	া		"জানুন"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative
SFX	v	য়া	ন/xX		[^ও]য়া	"চুন"		তিনি	চলিত		present imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	ন/xX		ওয়া		"খান"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative (a repeat)
SFX	v	নো	ন/ZX		নো		"ঘুমান"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative (a repeat)
SFX	v	ওয়া	োন		[^া]ওয়া	"রোন" 	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	v	া	ছি/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছি"	আমি	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছি/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছি"	আমি	চলিত		present continuous				$
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছি/xX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছি"	আমি	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছি/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছি"	আমি	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	v	া	ছিস/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছিস/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছিস/xX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present continuous$
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছিস/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	v	া	ছ/wX		[^য়]া	"জানছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছ/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছ/xX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছ/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	v	া	ছে/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছে"	সে	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছে/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছে"	সে	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছে/xX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছে"	সে	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছে/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছে"	সে	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	v	া	ছেন/wX	[^য়]া	"জানছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present continuous
SFX	v	য়া	চ্ছেন/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুচ্ছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present continuous$
SFX	v	ওয়া	চ্ছেন/xX	ওয়া		"খাচ্ছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present continuous$
SFX	v	নো	চ্ছেন/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছি		ওয়া		"খাইছি"	আমি	চলিত?	present continuous alt (HRT p154) আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছিস		ওয়া		"খাইছিস"	তুই	চলিত?	present continuous alt (HRT p154) আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছ		ওয়া		"খাইছ"	তুমি	চলিত?	present continuous alt (HRT p154) আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছে		ওয়া		"খাইছে"	সে	চলিত?	present continuous alt (HRT p154) আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	ইছেন		ওয়া		"খাইছেন"	তিনি	চলিত?	present continuous alt (HRT p154) আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	িতেছি/wX	া		"জানিতেছি" আমি	        সাধু	present continuous	$
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছি/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছি"	আমি	         সাধু 	present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছি/βX	ওয়া	"খাইতেছি"/"চাহিতেছি" আমি সাধু 	present continuous	$
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছি/OX	নো		 "ঘুমাইতেছি" আমি       সাধু	present continuous
SFX	v	া	িতেছিস/wX [^য়]া	"জানিতেছিস" তুই	        সাধু	present continuous$
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছিস/xX [^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছিস"	তুই	        সাধু 	present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছিস/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছিস" তুই	        সাধু	present continuous$
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছিস/OX নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিস" তুই	        সাধু	present continuous$
SFX	v	া	িতেছ/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতেছ"	তুমি	        সাধু	present continuous$
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছ/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছ"	তুমি	        সাধু 	present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছ/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছ"	তুমি	        সাধু	present continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছ/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছ" তুমি	        সাধু	present continuous	$
SFX	v	া	িতেছে/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতেছে" সে	        সাধু	present continuous
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছে/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছে"	সে	        সাধু 	present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছে/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছে"	সে	        সাধু	present continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছে/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছে" 	সে	        সাধু	present continuous	$
SFX	v	া	িতেছেন/wX	[^য়]া	"জানিতেছেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	present continuous
SFX	v	য়া	ইতেছেন/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইতেছেন"	তিনি	        সাধু 	present continuous
SFX	v	ওয়া	তেছেন/βX	ওয়া		"খাইতেছেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	present continuous
SFX	v	নো	ইতেছেন/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছেন" তিনি	        সাধু	present continuous	$
SFX	v	া	ব/wX		^য়া]া		"জানব"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	ব		[^ও]য়া	"চোব"		আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	ব/γX		ওয়া		"খাব"		আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	ব/ZX		নো		"ঘুমাব"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	বো/wX	^য়া]া		"জানবো"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative alt
SFX	v	য়া	বো		[^ও]য়া	"চোবো"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative alt
SFX	v	ওয়া	বো/γX	ওয়া		"খাবো"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative alt
SFX	v	নো	বো/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাবো"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	বি/wX		^য়া]া		"জানবি"	তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	বি/xX		[^ও]য়া	"চুবি"		তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	বি/IX		ওয়া		"খাবি"		তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	বি/ZX		নো		"ঘুমাবি"	তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	বা/IX		ওয়া		"খাবা"		তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative alt
SFX	v	নো	বা/ZX		নো		"ঘুমাবা"	তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative alt
SFX	v	া	বে/wX		^য়া]া		"জানবে"	তুমি/সে চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	বে		[^ও]য়া	"চোবে"	তুমি/সে চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	বে/γX	ওয়া		"খাবে"		তুমি/সে চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	বে/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাবে"	তুমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	বা/wX		^য়া]া		"জানবা"	তুমি	চলিত		future & future imperative alt আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	য়া	বা		[^ও]য়া	"চোবা"	তুমি	চলিত		future & future imperative alt আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	বেন/wX	া 		"জানবেন"	তিনি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	বেন		[^ও]য়া	"চোবেন"	তিনি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	বেন/γX	ওয়া 		"খাবেন"	তিনি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	বেন/ZX	নো		"ঘুমাবেন"	তিনি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	িব/wX	^য়া]া		"জানিব"	আমি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	ইব/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইব"		আমি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	ব/βX		ওয়া		"খাইব"	আমি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	ইব/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইব"	আমি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	িবি/wX	^য়া]া		"জানিবি"	তুই	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	ইবি/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইবি"	তুই	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	বি/βX		ওয়া		"খাইবি"	তুই 	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	ইবি/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইবি"	তুই	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	িবা/wX	^য়া]া		"জানিবা"	তুই 	        সাধু	future & future imperative alt ???
SFX	v	য়া	ইবা/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইবা"	তুই	        সাধু	future & future imperative alt ???
SFX	v	ওয়া	বা/βX		ওয়া		"খাইবা"	তুই 	        সাধু	future & future imperative alt ???
SFX	v	নো	ইবা/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইবা"	তুই	        সাধু	future & future imperative alt ???
SFX	v	া	িবে/wX	^য়া]া		"জানিবে"	তুমি/সে        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	ইবে/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইবে"	তুমি/সে        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	বে/βX	ওয়া		"খাইবে"	তুমি/সে        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	ইবে/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইবে"	তুমি/সে        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	িবেন/wX	^য়া]া		"জানিবেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	য়া	ইবেন/xX	[^ও]য়া	"চুইবেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	ওয়া	বেন/βX	ওয়া		"খাইবেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	নো	ইবেন/OX	নো		"ঘুমাইবেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	v	া	লাম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	া	লুম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	লেম/wX	[^য়]া	"জানলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	য়া	লাম/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	য়া	লুম/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	য়া	লেম/xX	[^ও]য়া 	"চুলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	লাম/εX	ওয়া		"খেলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লুম/εX	ওয়া		"খেলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	ওয়া	লেম/εX	ওয়া		"খেলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	নো	লাম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমালাম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	নো	লুম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমালুম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	নো	লেম/ZX	নো		"ঘুমালেম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple	আঞ্চলিক
SFX	v	া	লি/wX 	[^য়]া	"জানলি"	তুই	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	য়া	লি/xX		[^ও]য়া 	"চুলি"		তুই	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লি/εX		ওয়া		"খেলি"	তুই	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	নো	লি/ZX		নো		"ঘুমালি"	তুই	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	া	লে/wXi	[^য়]া	"জানলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	য়া	লে/xXi	[^ও]য়া 	"চুলে"		তুমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	v	ওয়া	লে/εXi	ওয়া		"খেলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past simple
